Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2101 to 38-2147 shall be known and may be cited as the Mental Health Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 72;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 720;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB932, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 13.
January 1, 2027